California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 registering authority shall register an applicant within 30 days of receiving all applicable documentation described in subdivision (b).

(2) The registering authority shall not register an applicant who fails to provide all applicable documentation described in subdivision (b) and shall deem the applicant’s request for registration incomplete.

(d) For each person registered pursuant to this section, the registering authority shall post all of the following on the registering authority’s internet website:

(1) The person’s name.

(2) The person’s California address of record.

(3) The person’s registration status.

(4) The state
 name and license number of each license from each original licensing jurisdiction.

(e) A person registered pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a licensee of the registering authority for purposes of the laws administered by that registering authority relating to standards of practice, discipline, and continuing education for the duration of the military orders described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and the registration shall expire when those military orders expire.

(f) A registering authority may take appropriate enforcement action against a person registered pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, revoking or suspending the registration of a person who does not meet the requirements of subdivision (b) or the laws applicable to licensees pursuant to subdivision (e).

(g) A
 registering authority shall not collect or require a fee for registration pursuant to this section.

(h) A registering authority may develop and publish guidance to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

116.

(a) The director may audit and review, upon the director’s own initiative, or upon the request of a consumer or licensee, inquiries and complaints regarding licensees, dismissals of disciplinary cases, the opening, conduct, or closure of investigations, informal conferences, and discipline short of formal accusation by the Medical Board of California, the allied health professional boards, and the Podiatric Medical Board of California. The director may make recommendations for changes to the disciplinary system to the appropriate board, the Legislature, or both.

(b) The director shall report to the Chairpersons of the Senate Business,
 Professions and Economic Development Committee and the Assembly Business and Professions Committee annually, commencing March 1, 1995, regarding the director’s findings from any audit, review, or monitoring and evaluation conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 21.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

118.

(a) The withdrawal of an application for a license after it has been filed with a board in the department shall not, unless the board has consented in writing to such withdrawal, deprive the board of its authority to institute or continue a proceeding against the applicant for the denial of the license upon any ground provided by law or to enter an order denying the license upon any such ground.

(b) The suspension, expiration, or forfeiture by operation of law of a license issued by a board in the department, or its suspension, forfeiture, or cancellation by order of the board or by order of a court of law, or its surrender without the written consent of the board, shall not, during any period in which it may be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated, deprive the board of its authority to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the licensee upon any ground provided by law or to enter an order suspending or revoking the license or otherwise taking disciplinary action against the licensee on any such ground.

(c) As used in this section, “board” includes an individual who is authorized by any provision of this code to issue, suspend, or revoke a license, and “license” includes “certificate,” “registration,” and “permit.“

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

119.

Any person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(a) Displays or causes or permits to be displayed or has in the person’s possession either of the following:

(1) A canceled, revoked, suspended, or fraudulently altered license.

(2) A fictitious license or any document simulating a license or purporting to be or have been issued as a license.

(b) Lends the person’s license to any other person or knowingly permits the use thereof by another.

(c) Displays or represents any license not issued to the person as being the person’s license.

(d) Fails or refuses to surrender to the issuing authority upon its lawful written demand any license, registration, permit, or certificate which has been suspended, revoked, or canceled.

(e) Knowingly permits any unlawful use of a license issued to the person.

(f) Photographs, photostats, duplicates, manufactures, or in any way reproduces any license or facsimile thereof in a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid license, or displays or has in the person’s possession any such photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction, or facsimile unless authorized by this
 code.

(g) Buys or receives a fraudulent, forged, or counterfeited license knowing that it is fraudulent, forged, or counterfeited. For purposes of this subdivision, “fraudulent” means containing any misrepresentation of fact.

As used in this section, “license” includes “certificate,” “permit,” “authority,” and “registration” or any other indicia giving authorization to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code or referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 22.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

120.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 119 shall not apply to a surviving spouse having in the surviving spouse’s possession or displaying a deceased spouse’s canceled certified public accountant certificate or canceled public accountant certificate that has been canceled by official action of the California Board of Accountancy.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 119, any person who has received a certificate of certified public accountant or a certificate of public accountant from the board may possess and may display the certificate received unless the person’s certificate, permit, or registration has been suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 23.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

121.

No licensee who has complied with the provisions of this code relating to the renewal of the licensee’s license prior to expiration of such license shall be deemed to be engaged illegally in the practice of the licensee’s business or profession during any period between such renewal and receipt of evidence of such renewal which may occur due to delay not the fault of the applicant.

As used in this section, “license” includes “certificate,” “permit,” “authorization,” and “registration,” or any other indicia giving authorization, by any agency, board, bureau, commission, committee, or entity within the Department of Consumer Affairs, to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code or
 by the board referred to in the Chiropractic Act or the Osteopathic
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 24.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

121.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, the application of delinquency fees or accrued and unpaid renewal fees for the renewal of expired licenses or registrations shall not apply to licenses or registrations that have lawfully been designated as inactive or retired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

122.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the department and each of the boards, bureaus, committees, and commissions within the department may charge a fee for the processing and issuance of a duplicate copy of any certificate of licensure or other form evidencing licensure or renewal of licensure. The fee shall be in an amount sufficient to cover all costs incident to the issuance of the duplicate certificate or other form but shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 951, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

123.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to engage in any conduct which subverts or attempts to subvert any licensing examination or the administration of an examination, including, but not limited to:

(a) Conduct which violates the security of the examination materials; removing from the examination room any examination materials without authorization; the unauthorized reproduction by any means of any portion of the actual licensing examination; aiding by any means the unauthorized reproduction of any portion of the actual licensing examination; paying or using professional or paid examination-takers for the purpose of reconstructing any portion of the licensing examination; obtaining examination questions or other examination material, except by specific authorization either before, during, or after an examination; or using or purporting to use any examination questions or materials which were improperly removed or taken from any examination for the purpose of instructing or preparing any applicant for examination; or selling, distributing, buying, receiving, or having unauthorized possession of any portion of a future, current, or previously administered licensing examination. 

(b) Communicating with any other examinee during the administration of a licensing examination; copying answers from another examinee or permitting one’s answers to be copied by another examinee; having in one’s possession during the administration of the licensing examination any books, equipment, notes, written or printed materials, or data of any kind, other than the examination materials distributed, or otherwise authorized to be in one’s possession during the examination; or impersonating any examinee or having an impersonator take the licensing examination on one’s behalf. 

Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under the authority provided for in any other provision of law. 

In addition to any other penalties, a person found guilty of violating this section, shall be liable for the actual damages sustained by the agency administering the examination not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and the costs of litigation. 

(c) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

123.5.

Whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices which constitute, or will constitute, a violation of Section 123, the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining such conduct on application of a board, the Attorney General or the district attorney of the county.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

The remedy provided for by this section shall be in addition to, and not a limitation on, the authority provided for in any other provision of law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 497 by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1022, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

124.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code, whenever written notice, including a notice, order, or document served pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is required to be given by any board in the department, the notice may be given by regular mail addressed to the last known address of the licensee or by personal service, at the option of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 25.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Operative July 1, 1997, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

125.

Any person, licensed under Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), or Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the disciplinary provisions of this code applicable to them, who conspires with a person not so licensed to violate any provision of this code, or who, with intent to aid or assist that person in violating those provisions does either of the following:

(a) Allows their license to be used by that person.

(b) Acts as their agent or partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 26.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

125.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, in any order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before any board within the department or before the Osteopathic Medical Board, upon request of the entity bringing the proceeding, the administrative law judge may direct a licensee found to have committed a violation or violations of the licensing act to pay a sum not to exceed the reasonable costs of the investigation and enforcement of the case.

(b) In the case of a disciplined licensee that is a corporation or a partnership, the order may be made against the licensed corporate entity or licensed partnership.

(c) A certified copy of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of costs where actual
 costs are not available, signed by the entity bringing the proceeding or its designated representative shall be prima facie evidence of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case. The costs shall include the amount of investigative and enforcement costs up to the date of the hearing, including, but not limited to, charges imposed by the Attorney General.

(d) The administrative law judge shall make a proposed finding of the amount of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case when requested pursuant to subdivision (a). The finding of the administrative law judge with regard to costs shall not be reviewable by the board to increase the cost award. The board may reduce or eliminate the cost award, or remand to the administrative law judge if the proposed decision fails to make a finding on costs requested pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) If an
 order for recovery of costs is made and timely payment is not made as directed in the board’s decision, the board may enforce the order for repayment in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any licensee to pay costs.

(f) In any action for recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the board shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may, in its discretion, conditionally renew or reinstate for a maximum of one year the license of any licensee who
 demonstrates financial hardship and who enters into a formal agreement with the board to reimburse the board within that one-year period for the unpaid costs.

(h) All costs recovered under this section shall be considered a reimbursement for costs incurred and shall be deposited in the fund of the board recovering the costs to be available upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(i) Nothing in this section shall preclude a board from including the recovery of the costs of investigation and enforcement of a case in any stipulated settlement.

(j) This section does not apply to any board if a specific statutory provision in that board’s licensing act provides for recovery of costs in an administrative disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

125.5.

(a) The superior court for the county in which any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act which constitutes a violation of a chapter of this code administered or enforced by a board within the department may, upon a petition filed by the board with the approval of the director, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct. The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. As used in this section, “board” includes commission, bureau, division, agency and a medical quality review committee.

(b) The superior court for the county in which any person has engaged in any act which constitutes a violation of a chapter of this code administered or enforced by a board within the department may, upon a petition filed by the board with the approval of the director, order such person to make restitution to persons injured as a result of such violation.

(c) The court may order a person subject to an injunction or restraining order, provided for in subdivision (a) of this section, or subject to an order requiring restitution pursuant to subdivision (b), to reimburse the petitioning board for expenses incurred by the board in its investigation related to its petition. 

(d) The remedy provided for by this section shall be in addition to, and not a limitation on, the authority provided for in any other section of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

125.6.

(a) (1) With regard to an applicant, every person who holds a license under the provisions of this code is subject to disciplinary action under the disciplinary provisions of this code applicable to that person if, because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code, the person refuses to perform the licensed activity or aids or incites the refusal to perform that licensed activity by another licensee, or if, because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code, the person makes
 any discrimination, or restriction in the performance of the licensed activity.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prevent a physician or health care professional licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) from considering any of the characteristics of a patient listed in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code if that consideration is medically necessary and for the sole purpose of determining the appropriate diagnosis or treatment of the patient.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to apply to discrimination by employers with regard to employees or prospective employees, nor shall this section authorize action against any club license issued pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 23425)
 of Chapter 3 of Division 9 because of discriminatory membership policy.

(4) The presence of architectural barriers to an individual with physical disabilities that conform to applicable state or local building codes and regulations shall not constitute discrimination under this section.

(b) (1) Nothing in this section requires a person licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) to permit an individual to participate in, or benefit from, the licensed activity of the licensee where that individual poses a direct threat to the health or safety of others. For this purpose, the term “direct threat” means a significant risk to the health or safety of others that cannot be eliminated by a modification of policies, practices, or procedures or
 by the provision of auxiliary aids and services.

(2) Nothing in this section requires a person licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) to perform a licensed activity for which the person is not qualified to perform.

(c) (1) “Applicant,” as used in this section, means a person applying for licensed services provided by a person licensed under this code.

(2) “License,” as used in this section, includes “certificate,” “permit,” “authority,” and “registration” or any other indicia giving authorization to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 28.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

125.7.

In addition to the remedy provided for in Section 125.5, the superior court for the county in which any licensee licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), or any initiative act referred to in that division, has engaged or is about to engage in any act that constitutes a violation of a chapter of this code administered or enforced by a board referred to in Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), may, upon a petition filed by the board and accompanied by an affidavit or affidavits in support thereof and a memorandum of points and authorities, issue a temporary restraining order or other appropriate order restraining the licensee from engaging in the business or profession for which the person is licensed or from any part thereof, in accordance with this section.

(a) If the affidavits in support of the petition show that the licensee has engaged or is about to engage in acts or omissions constituting a violation of a chapter of this code and if the court is satisfied that permitting the licensee to continue to engage in the business or profession for which the license was issued will endanger the public health, safety, or welfare, the court may issue an order temporarily restraining the licensee from engaging in the profession for which he or she is licensed.

(b) The order may not be issued without notice to the licensee unless it appears from facts shown by the affidavits that serious injury would result to the public before the matter can be heard on notice.

(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided by this section, proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) When a restraining order is issued pursuant to this section, or within a time to be allowed by the superior court, but in any case not more than 30 days after the restraining order is issued, an accusation shall be filed with the board pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code or, in the case of a licensee of the State Department of Health Services, with that department pursuant to Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code. The accusation shall be served upon the licensee as provided by Section 11505 of the Government Code. The licensee shall have all of the rights and privileges available as specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. However, if the licensee requests a hearing on the accusation, the board shall provide the licensee with a hearing within 30 days of the request and a decision within 15 days of the date the decision is received from the administrative law judge, or the court may nullify the restraining order previously issued. Any restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall be dissolved by operation of law at the time the board’s decision is subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) The remedy provided for in this section shall be in addition to, and not a limitation upon, the authority provided by any other provision of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

125.8.

In addition to the remedy provided for in Section 125.5, the superior court for the county in which any licensee licensed under Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18600) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 8 has engaged or is about to engage in any act which constitutes a violation of a chapter of this code administered or enforced by a board referred to in Division 3 (commencing with Section 5000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18600) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 8 may, upon a petition filed by the board and accompanied by an affidavit or affidavits in support thereof and a memorandum of points and authorities, issue a temporary restraining order or other appropriate order restraining the licensee from engaging in the business or profession for which the person is licensed or from any part thereof, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(a) If the affidavits in support of the petition show that the licensee has engaged or is about to engage in acts or omissions constituting a violation of a chapter of this code and if the court is satisfied that permitting the licensee to continue to engage in the business or profession for which the license was issued will endanger the public health, safety, or welfare, the court may issue an order temporarily restraining the licensee from engaging in the profession for which he is licensed.

(b) Such order may not be issued without notice to the licensee unless it appears from facts shown by the affidavits that serious injury would result to the public before the matter can be heard on notice.

(c) Except as otherwise specifically provided by this section, proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) When a restraining order is issued pursuant to this section, or within a time to be allowed by the superior court, but in any case not more than 30 days after the restraining order is issued, an accusation shall be filed with the board pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code. The accusation shall be served upon the licensee as provided by Section 11505 of the Government Code. The licensee shall have all of the rights and privileges available as specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code; however, if the licensee requests a hearing on the accusation, the board must provide the licensee with a hearing within 30 days of the request and a decision within 15 days of the date of the conclusion of the hearing, or the court may nullify the restraining order previously issued. Any restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall be dissolved by operation of law at such time the board’s decision is subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

125.9.

(a) A board, bureau, or commission within the department, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, may establish, by regulation, a system for the issuance to a licensee of a citation which may contain an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine assessed by the board, bureau, or commission where the licensee is in violation of the applicable licensing act or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) The system shall contain the following provisions:

(1) Citations shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been
 violated.

(2) Whenever appropriate, the citation shall contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation.

(3) In no event shall the administrative fine assessed by the board, bureau, or commission exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each inspection or each investigation made with respect to the violation, or five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation or count if the violation involves fraudulent billing submitted to an insurance company, the Medi-Cal program, or Medicare. In assessing a fine, the board, bureau, or commission shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the amount of the fine with respect to factors such as the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the licensee, and the history of previous violations.

(4) A citation or fine assessment
 issued pursuant to a citation shall inform the licensee that if the licensee desires a hearing to contest the finding of a violation, that hearing shall be requested by written notice to the board, bureau, or commission within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation or assessment. If a hearing is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(5) Failure of a licensee to pay a fine or comply with an order of abatement, or both, within 30 days of the date of assessment or order, unless the citation is being appealed, may result in disciplinary action being taken by the board, bureau, or commission. Where a citation is not contested and a fine is not paid, the full amount of the assessed fine shall be added to the fee for renewal of
 the license. A license shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(c) The system may contain the following provisions:

(1) A citation may be issued without the assessment of an administrative fine.

(2) Assessment of administrative fines may be limited to only particular violations of the applicable licensing act.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a fine is paid to satisfy an assessment based on the finding of a violation, payment of the fine and compliance with the order of abatement, if applicable, shall be represented as satisfactory resolution of the matter for purposes of public disclosure.

(e) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this
 section shall be deposited in the special fund of the particular board, bureau, or commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

126.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, any board, commission, examining committee, or other similarly constituted agency within the department required prior to the effective date of this section to submit reports to the Governor under any provision of this code shall not be required to submit such reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 660.)
-------------------------------------------

127.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the director may require such reports from any board, commission, examining committee, or other similarly constituted agency within the department as the director deems reasonably necessary on any phase of their operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 30.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

128.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is a misdemeanor to sell equipment, supplies, or services to any person with knowledge that the equipment, supplies, or services are to be used in the performance of a service or contract in violation of the licensing requirements of this code.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to cash sales of less than one hundred dollars ($100).

For the purposes of this section, “person” includes, but is not limited to, a company, partnership, limited liability company, firm, or corporation.

For the purposes of this section, “license” includes certificate or registration.

A violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

128.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if at the end of any fiscal year, an agency within the Department of Consumer Affairs, except the agencies referred to in subdivision (b), has unencumbered funds in an amount that equals or is more than the agency’s operating budget for the next two fiscal years, the agency shall reduce license or other fees, whether the license or other fees be fixed by statute or may be determined by the agency within limits fixed by statute, during the following fiscal year in an amount that will reduce any surplus funds of the agency to an amount less than the agency’s operating budget for the next two fiscal years.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if at the end of any fiscal
 year, the California Architects Board, the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Veterinary Medical Board, the Court Reporters Board of California, the Medical Board of California, the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians, or the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services has unencumbered funds in an amount that equals or is more than the agency’s operating budget for the next two fiscal years, the agency shall reduce license or other fees, whether the license or other fees be fixed by statute or may be determined by the agency within limits fixed by statute, during the following fiscal year in an amount that will reduce any surplus funds of the agency to an amount less than the agency’s operating budget for the next two fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 3.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

129.

(a) As used in this section, “board” means every board, bureau, commission, committee, and similarly constituted agency in the department that issues licenses.

(b) Each board shall, upon receipt of any complaint respecting an individual licensed by the board, notify the complainant of the initial administrative action taken on the complainant’s complaint within 10 days of receipt. Each board shall notify the complainant of the final action taken on the complainant’s complaint. There shall be a notification made in every case in which the complainant is known. If the complaint is not within the jurisdiction of the board or if the board is unable to dispose satisfactorily of the complaint, the
 board shall transmit the complaint together with any evidence or information it has concerning the complaint to the agency, public or private, whose authority in the opinion of the board will provide the most effective means to secure the relief sought. The board shall notify the complainant of this action and of any other means that may be available to the complainant to secure relief.

(c) The board shall, when the board deems it appropriate, notify the person against whom the complaint is made of the nature of the complaint, may request appropriate relief for the complainant, and may meet and confer with the complainant and the licensee in order to mediate the complaint. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as authorizing or requiring any board to set or to modify any fee charged by a licensee.

(d) It shall be the continuing duty of the board to ascertain patterns of complaints and to report on all actions taken with respect to those patterns of complaints to the director and to the Legislature at least once per year. The board shall evaluate those complaints dismissed for lack of jurisdiction or no violation and recommend to the director and to the Legislature at least once per year the statutory changes it deems necessary to implement the board’s functions and responsibilities under this section.

(e) It shall be the continuing duty of the board to take whatever action it deems necessary, with the approval of the director, to inform the public of its functions under this section.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, upon receipt of a child custody evaluation report
 submitted to a court pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3110) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Family Code, the board shall notify the noncomplaining party in the underlying custody dispute, who is a subject of that report, of the pending investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 31.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

130.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the term of office of any member of an agency designated in subdivision (b) shall be for a term of four years expiring on June 1.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following boards or committees:

(1) The Medical Board of California.

(2) The Podiatric Medical Board of California.

(3) The Physical Therapy Board of California.

(4) The Board of Registered Nursing, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 2703.

(5) The Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians.

(6) The California State Board of Optometry.

(7) The California State Board of Pharmacy.

(8) The Veterinary Medical Board.

(9) The California Architects Board.

(10) The Landscape Architect Technical Committee.

(11) The Contractors State License Board.

(12) The Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(13) The Court Reporters Board of California.

(14) The State Athletic
 Commission.

(15) The Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(16) The Respiratory Care Board of California.

(17) The Acupuncture Board.

(18) The Board of Psychology.

(19) The Structural Pest Control Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 1.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

131.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no member of an agency designated in subdivision (b) of Section 130 or member of a board, commission, committee, or similarly constituted agency in the department shall serve more than two consecutive full terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 850, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

132.

No board, commission, examining committee, or any other agency within the department may institute or join any legal action against any other agency within the state or federal government without the permission of the director.

Prior to instituting or joining in a legal action against an agency of the state or federal government, a board, commission, examining committee, or any other agency within the department shall present a written request to the director to do so.

Within 30 days of receipt of the request, the director shall communicate the director’s approval or denial of the request and the director’s reasons for approval or denial to the
 requesting agency in writing. If the director does not act within 30 days, the
 request shall be deemed approved.

A requesting agency within the department may override the director’s denial of its request to institute or join a legal action against a state or federal agency by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board, commission, examining committee, or other agency, which vote shall include the vote of at least one public member of that board, commission, examining committee, or other agency.
